Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-302
Civil rights; policy of state.

It is the policy of the State of Nebraska that there shall be no discrimination in the acquisition, ownership, possession, or enjoyment of housing throughout the State of Nebraska in accordance with Article I, section 25, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 1, p. 539;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-105;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 3.